Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5509
Surplus lines licensee; policy; information required.

A surplus lines licensee shall stamp or type upon the declaration page of each policy procured and delivered under the Surplus Lines Insurance Act the following information: (1) The licensee's name, business address, and surplus lines license number; (2) the name under which the licensee transacts business if different than the licensee's own name; and (3) the language: This policy is issued by a nonadmitted insurer, and in the event of the insolvency of such insurer, this policy will not be covered by the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association.

Laws 1978, LB 836, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 34;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 44-147.01;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 9.

Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association, see section 44-2404.